District of Columbia statutes.
4-752.01

Establishment of Interagency Council on Homelessness.

(a)

There is established in the District the Interagency Council on Homelessness for the purpose of facilitating interagency, cabinet-level leadership in planning, policymaking, program development, provider monitoring, and budgeting for the Continuum of Care of homeless services.

(b)

The Interagency Council is composed of:

(1)

The City Administrator, who shall serve as chairperson of the Interagency Council;

(1A)

The Director to End Homelessness, who shall assist the City Administrator in leading and coordinating the Interagency Council;

(2)

The administrative head of each of the following entities or divisions thereof:

(A)

Department of Human Services;

(B)

Department of Mental Health;

(C)

Child and Family Services Agency;

(D)

Department of Housing and Community Development;

(E)

Department of Health;

(F)

District of Columbia Housing Authority;

(G)

Department of Corrections;

(H)

Department of Employment Services;

(I)

Office of the State Superintendent of Education;

(J)

Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency;

(K)

Department of General Services;

(L)

Metropolitan Police Department; and

(M)

Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Questioning Affairs.

(3)

A representative of any private entity designated to approve or allocate any grants or contracts, on behalf of the Mayor, for services within the Continuum of Care;

(4)

A representative from a minimum of 4 and a maximum of 10 organizations that are providing services within the Continuum of Care;

(5)

A minimum of 2 and a maximum of 5 homeless or formerly homeless individuals;

(6)

A minimum of 2 and a maximum of 5 advocates for the District of Columbia’s homeless population;

(7)

The Chairman of the Council, or his or her designee, and the Chairman of the committee of the Council having purview over homeless services, or his or her designee, both of whom shall be non-voting members; and

(8)

The administrative head of the Office of Shelter Monitoring, who shall be a non-voting member.

(c)

All non-government members of the Interagency Council described in subsections (b)(4)-(6) of this section shall be nominated for appointment by the Mayor and approved by the Council. The Mayor shall transmit to the Council, within 90 days of October 22, 2005, nominations of each non-government member of the Interagency Council for a 60-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove a nomination by resolution within the 60-day review period, the nomination shall be deemed approved.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 4, 52 DCR 8113
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 405, 54 DCR 794
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-296, § 2(d), 54 DCR 1097
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5004(a), 55 DCR 7598
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 33(a), 59 DCR 6190
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5182(b), 60 DCR 12472
May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-100, § 2(b), 61 DCR 1873
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1023, 62 DCR 10905

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-751.01.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-262, in subsec. (b)(2)(J), substituted “Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency” for “District of Columbia Emergency Management Agency”.
D.C. Law 16-296, in subsec. (b), added par. (8).
D.C. Law 17-219, in subsec. (b)(2)(I), substituted “Office of the State Superintendent of Education” for “District of Columbia Public Schools”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Department of General Services” for “Office of Property Management” in (b)(2)(K).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added (b)(1A).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-100 added (b)(2)(M) and made related changes.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Questioning Affairs” for “Office of Gay, Lesbian, Bisexual, and Transgender Affairs” in (b)(2)(M).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5182(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5182(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1023 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Short Title

Short title: Section 5003 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle B of title V of the act may be cited as the “Housing First and Homeless Services Reform Amendment Act of 2008”.

Section 5181 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle Q of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Homeless Services Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.